Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.082

Temporary permit.

A person, not licensed in this state, who wishes to perform practices under the provisions of this chapter for a period not to exceed ninety days within a calendar year, must petition the board for a temporary permit to perform such practices. If the person is licensed or certified in another state deemed by the board to have standards equivalent to this chapter, or if the person is a member of a professional organization and holds a certificate deemed by the board to meet standards equivalent to this chapter, a permit may be issued. No fee shall be charged for such temporary permit.

[ 2004 c 262 s 11; 1996 c 191 s 67; 1984 c 279 s 82; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 73; 1965 c 70 s 23.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.